Maryland, session 2025, SB0071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “common ownership community” means:
(1) a condominium, as defined in § 11–101 of the Real Property Article;
(2) a cooperative housing corporation, as defined in § 5–6B–01 of the
Corporations and Associations Article; or
(3) a homeowners association, as defined in § 11B–101 of the Real Property
Article.
(b) There is a Task Force on Common Ownership Communities.
(c) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0071*

SENATE BILL 71
Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Labor, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) one representative of the Consumer Protection Division in the Office of
the Attorney General;
(6) one representative from the field of alternative dispute resolution,
appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(7) two representatives of the general public, appointed by the President of
the Senate:
(i) one of whom is a member of a board of directors of a large
common ownership community; and
(ii) one of whom is a member of a board of directors of a
medium–sized or small common ownership community;
(8) two representatives of the general public, appointed by the Speaker of
the House:
(i) one of whom is a member of a board of directors of a large
common ownership community; and
(ii) one of whom is a member of a board of directors of a
medium–sized or small common ownership community; and
(9) seven representatives of the general public, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one of whom owns a home or dwelling unit in a common
ownership community;
(ii) one of whom is not a member of a board of directors of a common
ownership community;
(iii) one of whom is an attorney with experience representing
common ownership communities;
(iv) one of whom is an insurance agent or broker with experience
serving common ownership communities;
(v) one of whom is a certified public accountant with experience
serving common ownership communities;
(vi) one of whom is a manager of a common ownership community;
and

SENATE BILL 71 3
(vii) one of whom is a representative of the Maryland State Builders
Association.
(d) The Task Force shall elect a chair from among its members.
(e) The Office of the Attorney General shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(f) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) The Task Force shall study:
(1) the education and training needs of common ownership community
boards and new and prospective owners of homes and dwelling units in common ownership
communities, including:
(i) creation and dissemination of information on the best practices
for common ownership community governing boards; and
(ii) options for providing classes and brochures through a State
agency or an institution regulated by the Maryland Higher Education Commission on:
1. the responsibilities of members of common ownership
community governing boards; and
2. the obligations and rights of owners of homes and dwelling
units in common ownership communities;
(2) the feasibility of establishing statewide alternative dispute resolution
services for common ownership communities, including:
(i) providing resources to the Office of the Attorney General for
enforcement of laws related to common ownership communities; and
(ii) offering assistance and guidance to owners of homes and
dwelling units in common ownership communities prior to litigation;
(3) the advisability of creating a permanent State Commission on Common
Ownership Communities;
(4) the feasibility of requiring common ownership community managers to
be licensed; and

SENATE BILL 71
(5) best practices related to common ownership community election
processes and governance.
(h) The Task Force shall submit a final report of its findings and
recommendations on or before December 31, 2026, to the Governor and, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.